apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="scewi/eć__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eć</l>        <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejã</l>       <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eje</l>       <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejymy</l>     <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejōm</l>      <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ej</l>        <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__wiydziołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__scewiały"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano<b/>było</l><r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/ŏć__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ŏć</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojã</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oji</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojymy</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojōm</l>      <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojōnc</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojōnc</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ō</l>         <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōn</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano<b/>było</l><r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="przist/ŏć__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ŏć</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojã</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oji</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojymy</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojōm</l>      <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ō</l>         <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōn</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōno<b/>było</l><r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pi/ŏć__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ŏć</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejã</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eje</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejymy</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejōm</l>      <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ej</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejōnc</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejōnc</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ō</l>         <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōn</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōno<b/>było</l><r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="zapi/ŏć__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ŏć</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejã</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eje</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejymy</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ejōm</l>      <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ej</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ō</l>         <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōn</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōno<b/>było</l><r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="prz/ŏć__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ŏć</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ajã</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aje</l>       <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ajymy</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ajōm</l>      <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ej</l>        <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ajōnc</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ajōnc</l>     <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŏ</l>         <r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano<b/>było</l><r>ŏć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="zniszczeć">       <i>zniszcz</i><par n="scewi/eć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pokrŏć">          <i>pokr</i><par n="przist/ŏć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przŏć">           <i>prz</i><par n="prz/ŏć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stŏć">            <i>st</i><par n="st/ŏć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zrympoleć">       <i>zrympol</i><par n="scewi/eć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="piŏć">            <i>pi</i><par n="pi/ŏć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ôkrŏć">           <i>ôkr</i><par n="przist/ŏć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zgupieć">         <i>zgupi</i><par n="scewi/eć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zbiydnieć">       <i>zbiydni</i><par n="scewi/eć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pojaśnieć">       <i>pojaśni</i><par n="scewi/eć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zestarzeć">       <i>zestarz</i><par n="scewi/eć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="postarzeć">       <i>postarz</i><par n="scewi/eć__vblex"/></e>
